Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2149
Payment by defendant of sums due; stay; decree.

If, after a decree for sale, entered against a defendant in such case, he shall bring into court the principal and interest due, with costs, the proceedings in the suit shall be stayed, but the court shall enter a decree of foreclosure and sale, to be enforced by a further order of the court, upon a subsequent default in the payment of any portion or installment of the principal, or any interest thereafter to grow due.

R.S.1867, Code § 857, p. 544;

R.S.1913, § 8266;

C.S.1922, § 9219;

C.S.1929, § 20-2151;

R.S.1943, § 25-2149.

Section is applicable only to cases where foreclosure is for interest or part of principal. It was not intended to relieve party from forfeiture. Beisel v. Artman, 10 Neb. 181, 4 N.W. 1011 (1880).